Illinois, session 104th, SB3303.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 5amended by changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 65/6)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-6)7    Sec. 6. Contents of Firearm Owner's Identification Card. 8    (a) A Firearm Owner's Identification Card, issued by the 9Illinois State Police at such places as the Director of the 10Illinois State Police shall specify, shall contain the 11applicant's name, residence, date of birth, sex, physical 12description, recent photograph, except as provided in 13subsection (c-5), and signature. Each Firearm Owner's 14Identification Card must have the Firearm Owner's 15Identification Card number boldly and conspicuously displayed 16on the face of the card. Each Firearm Owner's Identification 17Card must have printed on it the following: "CAUTION - This 18card does not permit bearer to UNLAWFULLY carry or use 19firearms." Before December 1, 2002, the Department of State 20Police may use a person's digital photograph and signature 21from his or her Illinois driver's license or Illinois 22Identification Card, if available. On and after December 1, 232002, the Illinois State Police (formerly the Department of   SB3303- 2 -LRB104 18123 WRO 31562 b1State Police) shall use a person's digital photograph and 2signature from his or her Illinois driver's license or 3Illinois Identification Card, if available. The Illinois State 4Police shall decline to use a person's digital photograph or 5signature if the digital photograph or signature is the result 6of or associated with fraudulent or erroneous data, unless 7otherwise provided by law.8    (b) A person applying for a Firearm Owner's Identification 9Card shall consent to the Illinois State Police using the 10applicant's digital driver's license or Illinois 11Identification Card photograph, if available, and signature on 12the applicant's Firearm Owner's Identification Card. The 13Secretary of State shall allow the Illinois State Police 14access to the photograph and signature for the purpose of 15identifying the applicant and issuing to the applicant a 16Firearm Owner's Identification Card.17    (c) The Secretary of State shall conduct a study to 18determine the cost and feasibility of creating a method of 19adding an identifiable code, background, or other means on the 20driver's license or Illinois Identification Card to show that 21an individual is not disqualified from owning or possessing a 22firearm under State or federal law. The Secretary shall report 23the findings of this study August 17, 2002 (12 months after the 24effective date of Public Act 92-442).25    (c-5) If a person qualifies for a photograph exemption, in 26lieu of a photograph, the Firearm Owner's Identification Card   SB3303- 3 -LRB104 18123 WRO 31562 b1shall contain a copy of the card holder's fingerprints. Each 2Firearm Owner's Identification Card described in this 3subsection (c-5) must have printed on it the following: "This 4card is valid for firearm purchases through a federally 5licensed firearms dealer when presented with photographic 6identification, such as a REAL ID compliant or standard 7State-issued driver's license, a REAL ID compliant or standard 8State-issued identification card, or a United States passport. 9"This card is only valid for firearm purchases through a 10federally licensed firearms dealer when presented with 11photographic identification, as prescribed by 18 U.S.C. 12922(t)(1)(C)." 13(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 14102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.